Utah statutes.
63G-6a-108.   Procurements under direction and control of division -- Exception for procurement unit with independent procurement authority.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a procurement unit may not engage in a procurement unless:

(a)  the procurement is made under the direction and control of the division; or

(b)  the division, pursuant to rules made by the board, permits the procurement unit to make the procurement on its own.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to the following procurement units, all of which have independent procurement authority:

(a)  a legislative procurement unit;

(b)  a judicial procurement unit;

(c)  an educational procurement unit;

(d)  a local government procurement unit;

(e)  a conservation district;

(f)  a local building authority;

(g)  a local district;

(h)  a public corporation;

(i)  a special service district;

(j)  the Utah Housing Corporation; or

(k)  a public transit district.

(3)  A procurement unit with independent procurement authority is not exempt from complying with the requirements of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

